District of Columbia statutes.
22-1803

Attempts to commit crime.

Whoever shall attempt to commit any crime, which attempt is not otherwise made punishable by chapter 19 of An Act to establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1321), shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or both. Except, whoever shall attempt to commit a crime of violence as defined in § 23-1331 shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or both.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1337, ch. 854, § 906
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(a), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(y), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 16-801, § 22-3231, § 22-3232, and § 22-4001.
1981 Ed., § 22-103.
1973 Ed., § 22-103.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted the first occurrence of “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $1,000” and the second occurrence of “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $5,000”.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(a) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(y) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
“Chapter 19 of an Act to establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1321),” referred to in this section, consists of §§ 798 to 910 of the act of March 3, 1901, the provisions of which are codified throughout this title as well as in §§ 36-101, 36-102, 36-151 to 36-157, 50-2203.01 to 50-2203.03. For the complete codification of Chapter 19 of the March 3, 1901 act, please consult the Disposition Tables appearing the Tables Volume.
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.